Vermont, session 2025-2026, S183.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 2029 is amended to read:
§ 2029. HOME IMPROVEMENT AND LAND IMPROVEMENT FRAUD
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Home improvement” means the fixing, replacing, remodeling,
removing, renovation, alteration, conversion, improvement, demolition, or
rehabilitation of or addition to any building, or any portion thereof, including
roofs, that is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling unit.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 2 of 8
(2)(A) “Land improvement” means:
(i) the construction, replacement, installation, paving, or
improvement of driveways, sidewalks, trails, roads, or other landscape
features;
(ii) site work, including grading, excavation, landscape irrigation,
site utility installation, site preparation, and other construction work that is not
part of a building on a parcel;
(iii) the limbing, pruning, cutting, or removal of trees or
shrubbery; and
(iv) forestry operations, as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A.
§ 2602, including the construction of trails, roads, and structures associated
with forestry operations and the transportation off-site of trees, shrubs, or
timber.
(B) “Land improvement” includes activities made in connection with
a residence or dwelling or those activities not made in connection with a
residence or dwelling.
(b) A person commits the offense of home improvement or land
improvement fraud when the person knowingly enters into a contract or
agreement, written or oral, for $1,000.00 or more, with an owner for home
improvement or land improvement, or into several contracts or agreements for

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 3 of 8
$2,500.00 or more in the aggregate, with more than one owner for home
improvement or land improvement, and the person knowingly:
(1)(A) fails to perform the contract or agreement, in whole or in part;
and
(B) when the owner requests performance, payment, or a refund of
payment made, the person fails to either:
(i) refund the payment;
(ii) make and comply with a definite plan for completion of the
work that is agreed to by the owner; or
(iii) make the payment promises performance that the person does
not intend to perform or knows will not be performed, in whole or in part;
(2) misrepresents a material fact relating to the terms of the contract or
agreement or to the condition of any portion of the property involved;
(3) uses or employs any unfair or deceptive act or practice in order to
induce, encourage, or solicit such person to enter into any contract or
agreement or to modify the terms of the original contract or agreement; or
(4) when there is a declared state of emergency, charges for goods or
services related to the emergency a price that exceeds two times the average
price for the goods or services and the increase is not attributable to the
additional costs incurred in connection with providing those goods or services.
(b) A person commits the offense of home improvement or land
improvement fraud when the person knowingly enters into a contract, or

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 4 of 8
agreement, or change order, written or oral, for $1,000.00 or more, with an
owner for home improvement or land improvement, or into several contracts,
or agreements, or change orders for $2,500.00 or more in the aggregate, with
more than one owner for home improvement or land improvement, and the
person knowingly:
(1)(A) fails to perform the contract or agreement, in whole or in part;
and
(B) when the owner requests performance, payment, or a refund of
payment made, the person fails to either:
(i) refund the payment;
(ii) make and comply with a definite plan for completion of the
work that is agreed to by the owner; or
(iii) make the payment promises performance that the person does
not intend to perform or knows will not be performed, in whole or in part;
(2) misrepresents a material fact relating to the terms of the contract, or
agreement, or change order or to the condition of any portion of the property
involved;
(3) uses or employs any unfair or deceptive act or practice in order to
induce, encourage, or solicit such person to enter into any contract, or
agreement, or change order or to modify the terms of the original contract, or
agreement, or change order; or
(4) when there is a declared state of emergency, charges for goods or
services related to the emergency a price that exceeds two times the average
price for the goods or services and the increase is not attributable to the
additional costs incurred in connection with providing those goods or services.
(c) Whenever a person is convicted of home improvement or land
improvement fraud or of fraudulent acts related to home improvement or land
improvement:
(1) the person shall notify the Office of the Attorney General;
(2) the court shall notify the Office of the Attorney General; and
(3) the Office of the Attorney General shall place the person’s name on
the Home Improvement and Land Improvement Fraud Registry and shall

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 5 of 8
include on the Registry whether the person has notified the Office of Attorney
General under subdivision (e)(1) of this section that they have filed a surety
bond or an irrevocable letter of credit.
(d)(1) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be
imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both,
if the loss to a single consumer is less than $1,500.00.
(2) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of
subsection (b) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than three years or
fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(3) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be
imprisoned not more than three years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or
both, if:
(A) the loss to a single consumer is $1,500.00 or more; or
(B) the loss to more than one consumer is $2,500.00 or more in the
aggregate.
(4) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of
subdivision (b)(3) of this section shall be imprisoned not more than five years
or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
(5) A person who violates this subsection (c) or (e) or subsection (f) of
this section shall be imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more
than $1,000.00, or both.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 6 of 8
(e)(1) A person who is sentenced pursuant to subdivision (d)(2), (3), or (4)
of this section, or convicted of fraudulent acts related to home improvement or
land improvement, may engage in home improvement or land improvement
activities for compensation only if:
(A) the work is for a company or individual engaged in home
improvement or land improvement activities and the company or individual
has not previously committed a violation under this section; the person and the
management of the company or the individual are not a family member, a
household member, or a current or prior business associate; and the person first
notifies the company or individual of the conviction and notifies the Office of
the Attorney General of the person’s current address and telephone number;
the name, address, and telephone number of the company or individual for
whom the person is going to work; and the date on which the person will start
working for the company or individual; or
(B) the person notifies the Office of the Attorney General of the
intent to engage in home improvement or land improvement activities, and that
the person has filed a surety bond or an irrevocable letter of credit with the
Office in an amount of not less than $250,000.00 and pays on a regular basis
all fees associated with maintaining such bond or letter of credit.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 7 of 8
(2) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Business associate” means a person joined together with another
person to achieve a common financial objective.
(B) “Family member” means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, next of
kin, domestic partner, or legal guardian.
(C) “Household member” means a person who, for any period of
time, is living or has lived together, is sharing or has shared occupancy of a
dwelling.
(f) The Office of the Attorney General shall release the letter of credit at
such time when:
(1) any claims against the person relating to home improvement or land
improvement fraud have been paid;
(2) there are no pending actions or claims against the person for home
improvement or land improvement fraud; and
(3) the person has not been engaged in home improvement or land
improvement activities for at least sixyears and has signed an affidavit so
attesting.
(g) A person convicted of home improvement or land improvement fraud
is prohibited from applying for or receiving State grants or from contracting,
directly or indirectly, with the State or any of its subdivisions for a period of

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE AND HOUSE S.183
2026 Page 8 of 8
up to three years following the date of the conviction, as determined by the
Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.
(h) A person subject to the financial surety requirements of section 3605 of
this title for timber trespass shall not engage in land improvement activities
unless the person has satisfied the financial surety requirements for timber
trespass.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.